Colorado, session 2026A, HB1078.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-35-110, amend (1)
as follows:
22-35-110. Exclusions - limitation.
(1) (a) Except for courses offered as part of the TREP program
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

pursuant to section 22-35-108.5, This article 35 does not apply to any A
course that is offered as part of a program of off-campus instruction
established pursuant to section 23-1-109 (1) to (5) UNLESS THE COURSE
OFFERED MEETS ALL REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ARTICLE 35 AND THE
REQUIREMENTS OF AN ACCREDITING AGENCY RECOGNIZED BY THE UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.
(b) AFTER JULY 1, 2028, ADDITIONAL COURSES THAT ARE ELIGIBLE
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION FOR PARTICIPATION IN CONCURRENT
ENROLLMENT COURSES SHALL NOT BE APPROVED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE
35 UNLESS THE APPROPRIATION MADE BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO THE
DEPARTMENT IS SUFFICIENT FOR THE DEPARTMENT TO COMPLY WITH COURSE
AUDIT AND OVERSIGHT REQUIREMENTS. COURSES THAT ARE ELIGIBLE
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION FOR PARTICIPATION AS CONCURRENT
ENROLLMENT COURSES AND ARE APPROVED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 35
BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, RETAIN THEIR APPROVED STATUS. BEGINNING IN THE
ANNUAL GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS ACT FOR THE 2028-29 STATE FISCAL
YEAR, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL INDICATE VIA FOOTNOTE TO THE
ANNUAL GENERAL APPROPRIATIONS ACT WHETHER THE FUNDING FOR THE
DEPARTMENT IS CALCULATED TO PROVIDE SUFFICIENT FUNDING FOR COURSE
AUDIT AND OVERSIGHT REQUIREMENTS TO ALLOW ADDITIONAL COURSES TO
BE APPROVED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, appropriations made in the annual general appropriation act for the
2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of higher education are adjusted
as follows:
(a) The general fund appropriation for the college opportunity fund
program to be used for fee-for-service contracts with state institutions
pursuant to section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., is decreased by $80,178; and
(b) The reappropriated funds appropriation for the regents of the
university of Colorado received from the fee-for-service contracts with state
institutions pursuant to section 23-18-303.5, C.R.S., under subsection (1)(a)
of this section is decreased by $80,178.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1078

fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of higher education for the college opportunity fund program to be used for
fee-for-service contracts with state institutions pursuant to section
23-18-303.5, C.R.S., is less than the amount of the adjustment required in
subsection (1)(a) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of higher
education for the college opportunity fund program to be used for
fee-for-service contracts with state institutions pursuant to section
23-18-303.5, C.R.S.
SECTION 3. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$66,056 is appropriated to the department of education. This appropriation
is from the general fund. To implement this act, the department may use this
appropriation as follows:
(a) $21,685 for use by school district operations for administration
related to public school finance, which amount is based on an assumption
that the division will require an additional 0.2 FTE; and
(b) $44,371 for use by student pathways for postsecondary
workforce readiness administration, which amount is based on an
assumption that the division will require an additional 0.4 FTE.
SECTION 4. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 2 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 2 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1078

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1078